en: Banana variety: Baby (Nino); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (Apple Banana); Plantain; Red Banana; Other
vi: Giống chuối: Baby (Nino); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (Chuối táo); Plantain; Chuối đỏ; Khác
ru: Сорт бананов: Беби (Ниньо); Блю Джава; Бурро; Кавендиш; Голдфингер; Гро-Мишель; Дамский пальчик; Манзано (яблочный банан); Плантан; Красный банан; Другое
sk-SK: Odroda banánov: Baby (Niño); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (Apple Banana); Plantain; Red Banana; Iné
es: Variedad de banana: Baby (niño); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Dedo de dama; Manzano (plátano manzano); Plátano macho; Plátano rojo; Otra
ro-RO: Soi de banane: Baby (Nino); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (Banane măr); Plantain; Banane roșii; Altele
pt-PT: Variedade de banana: Baby (Nino); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (banana-maçã); Plátano; Banana vermelha; Outro
hu: Banánfajta: Bébi (Nino); Kék Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (Alma banán); Főzőbanán (Plantain); Vörös banán; Egyéb
el: Ποικιλία μπανάνας: Μίνι (Nino); Blue Java; Burro; Κάβεντις (Cavendish); Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Μανζάνο (Μπανάνα-Μήλο); Πλαντέιν (Plantain); Κόκκινη Μπανάνα; Άλλο
pl: Odmiana banana: Baby (Nino); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (banan jabłkowy); Plantan; Czerwony banan; Inne
fr: Variété de banane: Baby (Nino); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (banane pomme); Plantain; Banane rouge; Autre
cs: Odrůda banánů: Baby (Nino); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (jablečný banán); Banán na vaření (plantain); Červený banán; Jiné
sv: Banansort: Baby (Nino); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (äppelbanan); Kokbanan; Röd banan; Övrigt
th: กล้วยสายพันธุ์ต่างๆ: กล้วยเบบี้ (นิโน่); บลูจาวา; เบอร์โร; หอมคาเวนดิช; โกลด์ฟิงเกอร์; หอมทอง; กล้วยเล็บมือนาง; มันซาโน (แอปเปิลบานาน่า); กล้าย; กล้วยนาก; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Сорт банани: Бейби (Нино); Синя Ява; Буро; Кавендиш; Голдфингър; Гро Мишел; Лейди Фингър; Манзано (ябълков банан); Плантайн; Червен банан; Друго
lt-LT: Bananų veislė: Mažieji (Nino); Mėlynieji Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (obuolių skonio bananai); Miltiniai bananai (Plantain); Raudonieji bananai; Kita
hr-HR: Sorta banana: Baby (Nino); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (Apple Banana); Plantana; Crvena banana; Ostalo
pt-BR: Variedade de banana: Ouro (Baby/Nino); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish (Nanica); Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Dedo de moça; Maçã (Manzano); Banana-da-terra; Banana-vermelha; Outro
zh-CN: 香蕉品种: 婴儿蕉 (Nino); 蓝爪哇蕉; 布罗蕉; 卡文迪什蕉; 金手指蕉; 大麦克蕉; 手指蕉 (Lady Finger); 苹果蕉 (Manzano); 大蕉; 红香蕉; 其他
zh-TW: 香蕉品種: 嬰兒蕉 (Nino); 藍爪哇蕉; 布羅蕉; 香芽蕉; 金手指蕉; 大米契爾蕉; 旦蕉; 蘋果蕉; 大蕉; 紅皮蕉; 其他
fi: Banaanilajike: Minibanaani (Nino); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (omenabanaani); Keittobanaani; Punainen banaani; Muu
it: Varietà di banana: Baby (Niño); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (Mela-banana); Platano; Banana rossa; Altro
de: Bananensorte: Baby (Niño); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (Apfelbanane); Kochbanane; Rote Banane; Sonstige
da: Bananvariant: Baby (Nino); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (æblebanan); Kogebanan; Rød banan; Andet
ja: バナナの種類: ベビー (ニーニョ); ブルー・ジャバ; ブロ; キャベンディッシュ; ゴールドフィンガー; グロス・ミシェル; レディーフィンガー; マンザノ (アップルバナナ); プランテイン; レッドバナナ; その他
nl: Bananen ras: Baby (Nino); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (appelbanaan); Bakbanaan; Rode banaan; Overig
ko: 바나나 품종: 베이비(니뇨); 블루 자바; 부로; 캐번디시; 골드핑거; 그로 미셸; 레이디 핑거; 만자노(애플 바나나); 플랜틴; 레드 바나나; 기타
tr: Muz çeşidi: Bebek (Nino); Mavi Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (Elma Muzu); Plantain; Kırmızı Muz; Diğer
nb: Bananvariant: Baby (Nino); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (eplebanan); Kokebanan; Rød banan; Annet
sl-SI: Sorta banan: Baby (Nino); Blue Java; Burro; Cavendish; Goldfinger; Gros Michel; Lady Finger; Manzano (jabolčna banana); Plantana (kuharska banana); Rdeča banana; Drugo